Maine, session 132, LD226.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Sears Island conservation. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the Department of Transportation, in collaboration with the Maine Coast Heritage
Trust, shall take all reasonable steps to ensure the conservation and protection of all lands
on Sears Island that are not currently under a permanent conservation easement. These
lands are referred to as the "Transportation Parcel" in the buffer conservation easement and
must be under the same restrictions as the current adjacent conservation easement areas
and must be managed together by the land management entity appointed by the
conservation easement holder, the Maine Coast Heritage Trust. Approval of the land
management entity nominated by the Maine Coast Heritage Trust must be granted by the
Department of Transportation in a timely manner and may not be withheld without cause.
For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings.
1. "Buffer conservation easement" means the easement between the State and the
Maine Coast Heritage Trust dated January 22, 2009 and recorded in the Waldo County
Registry of Deeds, Book 3289, Page 300.
2. "Transportation Parcel" means the parcel of land on Sears Island in the Town of
Searsport contained in the buffer conservation easement that has been reserved for port
development by the Department of Transportation.